Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4303.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 3 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section 9B, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, and inserting in place thereof the following new section:-
Section 9B.
(a) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall each
receive for each regular annual session additional regular compensation equal to 75% of the
amount calculated pursuant to Article CXVIII.
(b) The chair of the senate committee on ways and means, the chair of the house
committee on ways and means, and the floor leader of each of the major political parties in the
senate and house of representatives shall each receive for each regular annual session additional
regular compensation equal to 50% of the amount calculated pursuant to Article CXVIII.
(c) The assistant floor leader and the second assistant floor leader of each of the major
political parties in the senate and house of representatives, the third assistant floor leader of the
of 5

minority party in the senate and the house of representatives, the vice chair of the senate
committee on ways and means, the vice chair of the house committee on ways and means, the
ranking minority member of the senate committees on ways and means, and the ranking minority
member of the house committees on ways and means shall each receive for each regular annual
session additional regular compensation equal to 33% of the amount calculated pursuant to
Article CXVIII.
(d) The senate chair and the house chair of committees established by the joint rules of
the senate and house of representatives to which more than fifty petitions are referred by the
senate and the house of representatives before March 1 of the first year of a biennial session of
the general court shall each receive for each regular annual session additional regular
compensation equal to 33% of the amount calculated pursuant to Article CXVIII.
(e) Senators receiving additional regular compensation pursuant to subsection (b) or (c)
of this section who are members of one or more committees the chairs of which are eligible to be
paid additional regular compensation pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, senators
receiving additional regular compensation pursuant to subsection (d) of this section who are
members of more than one committee the chairs of which are eligible to be paid additional
regular compensation pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, and representatives receiving no
additional regular compensation pursuant to subsections (a), (b), (c) or (d) of this section who are
members of one or more committees the chairs of which are eligible to be paid additional regular
compensation pursuant to subsection (d) of this section shall each receive for each regular annual
session additional regular compensation equal to 20% of the amount calculated pursuant to
Article CXVIII; provided further that senators receiving no additional regular compensation
pursuant to subsections (a), (b), (c) or (d) of this section who are members of more than four
of 5

committees the chairs of which are eligible to be paid additional regular compensation pursuant
to subsection (d) of this section shall each receive for each regular annual session additional
regular compensation equal to 40% of the amount calculated pursuant to Article CXVIII;
provided however that no senator shall receive additional regular compensation for service in
more than 2 positions and no representative shall receive additional regular compensation for
service in more than 1 position.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each member of the general court shall
be paid that member's compensation for each session on a bi-weekly basis. Compensation shall
include any amounts a member is entitled to pursuant to Article CXVIII, this section, section 9C
or as otherwise established by law.
(g) Each member of the general court receiving additional regular compensation pursuant
to subsections (a), (b), (c) or (d) of this section shall be paid 50% of that member’s additional
regular compensation for each session on a bi-weekly basis.
(h)(1) Upon certification by the clerk of the senate and the clerk of the house of
representatives pursuant to subsection (i)(1) of this section, each member of the general court
receiving additional regular compensation pursuant to subsection (d) of this section shall be paid
50% of that member’s additional regular compensation for the first year of a biennial session of
the general court in the last bi-weekly payment in such year.
(2) Upon certification by the clerk of the senate and the clerk of the house of
representatives pursuant to subsection (i)(2) of this section, each member of the general court
receiving additional regular compensation pursuant to subsection (d) of this section shall be paid
of 5

50% of that member’s additional regular compensation for the second year of a biennial session
of the general court in the last bi-weekly payment in such year.
(i)(1) On the third Monday in December of the first year of a biennial session of the
general court, the clerk of the senate and the clerk of the house of representatives shall jointly
examine the records of each committee the chairs of which are eligible to be paid additional
regular compensation pursuant to subsection (d) of this section. For each such committee, if the
records document that as of that date the committee has held a public hearing and a public mark-
up session on each bill referred to it before November 1 of such year and that every report filed
by the committee has been approved by a vote of a majority of the members of the committee at
a public meeting at which a quorum was present, the clerk of the senate and the clerk of the
house of representatives shall so certify jointly. Such certification shall constitute the
certification required pursuant to subsection (h)(1) of this section to pay additional regular
compensation pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.
(2) On the last Friday in May of the second year of a biennial session of the general court,
the clerk of the senate and the clerk of the house of representatives shall jointly examine the
records of committees the chairs of which are eligible to be paid additional regular compensation
pursuant to subsection (d) of this section. For each such committee, if the records document that
the committee has held a public hearing and a public mark-up session on each bill referred to it
before April 15 of such year and has filed a report on each such bill approved by a vote of a
majority of the members of the committee at a public meeting at which a quorum was present,
the clerk of the senate and the clerk of the house of representatives shall so certify jointly. Such
certification shall constitute the certification required pursuant to subsection (h)(2) of this section
to pay additional regular compensation pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.
of 5

(3) On each of the dates specified in subsections (i)(1) and (i)(2) of this section, the clerk
of the senate and the clerk of the house of representatives shall calculate a compliance rate for
each of the first year and the second year of a biennial session of the general court. For purposes
of this subsection, the compliance rate for each such year is defined as the percentage of
committees the chairs of which are eligible to be paid additional regular compensation pursuant
to subsection (d) of this section for which the clerk of the senate and the clerk of the house of
representatives have issued a certification for such year pursuant to subsection (h)(1) or (h)(2) of
this section.
(j) Each member of the general court receiving additional regular compensation pursuant
to subsections (a), (b) or (c) of this section shall be paid in the last bi-weekly payment in each
regular annual session the percentage of that member’s additional regular compensation for each
session equal to 50% multiplied by the compliance rate as defined in subsection (i)(3) of this
section.
(k) Each member of the general court who serves in a position for which additional
regular compensation is paid pursuant to this section for a period less than an entire biennial
session of the general court shall receive such additional regular compensation prorated for the
time of that person's service in that position.
of 5